Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2284.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The department of administration shall adopt written
policies governing the negotiated procurement of state medicaid
services to be provided by managed care organizations pursuant to a
contract with the Kansas program of medical assistance governed by
K.S.A. 75-37,102, and amendments thereto.
(b) Such policy shall include:
(1) A prohibition on destruction of records, including evaluation
documents, that complies with the Kansas open records act;
(2) adoption of a tiebreak procedure if part of the evaluation
process used to make award recommendations involves scoring by
individuals or committees;
(3) a requirement to be transparent with the legislature during each
step of the procurement process to the fullest extent permitted by state
law; and
(4) an appeals process. Appeals shall be overseen and adjudicated
by an appeals committee. Such committee shall be comprised of the
president of the senate, the chairperson and ranking minority member
of the senate standing committee on financial institutions and
insurance, the chairperson and ranking minority member of the senate
standing committee on public health and welfare, the speaker of the
house of representatives, the chairperson and ranking minority member
of the house standing committee on insurance and the chairperson and
ranking minority member of the house standing committee on health
and human services. Such appeals committee shall oversee and
adjudicate appeals pursuant to this section in accordance with policies
adopted by the department of administration.
(c) Policies required by this section shall be adopted and
implemented prior to July 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the HOUSE, and passed
that body
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
______________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
__________________________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.